Washington statutes.
RCW 6.21.070

Manner of sale of personal property—Bill of sale—Sheriff's deed if real estate contract.

If the sale is of personal property capable of manual delivery, and not in the possession of a third person, it shall be within view of those who attend the sale and shall be sold in such parcels as are likely to bring the highest price; and upon receipt of the purchase money, the sheriff shall deliver the property to the purchaser and shall give a bill of sale containing an acknowledgment of the payment if the purchaser requests it. A vendor's interest under a real estate contract, including vendor's legal title to the real property, shall be treated as personal property for purposes of sale, but the sheriff shall give the purchaser both a bill of sale covering the vendor's interest under the contract and a sheriff's deed covering the vendor's legal title to the real property. In all other sales of personal property, the sheriff shall give the purchaser a bill of sale with an acknowledgment of payment. The sheriff shall return the proceeds with the execution to the clerk who issued the writ for payment as required by law.

[ 1987 c 442 s 607; Code 1881 s 362; 1877 p 78 s 365; 1869 p 94 s 358; 1854 p 183 s 270; RRS s 586. Formerly RCW 6.24.050.]